South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4797.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 41-8-20(B) and (C) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B) All private employers who are required by federal law to complete and maintain federal employment eligibility verification forms or documents must register and participate in the E-Verify federal work authorization program, or its successor, the Systematic Alien Verification of Entitlement (SAVE) work authorization program or its successor, or any other work authorization programs of comparable or superior quality as evaluated and approved by the South Carolina Department of Employment and Workforce in subsection (C) to verify the work authorization of every new employee within three business days after employing a new employee. A private employer who does not comply with the requirements of this subsection violates the private employer's licenses. (C) The South Carolina Department of Employment and Workforce shall: (1) evaluate and approve any work authorization programs proposed by a private employer to determine if the quality of the program meets or exceeds the quality of E-Verify and SAVE and provide private employers with a list of the programs it determines meet or exceed the quality of E-Verify and SAVE; and (2) provide private employers with technical advice and electronic access to the E-Verify federal work authorization program's website of any work authorization program approved in item (1) for the sole purpose of registering and participating in the program. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----